Utah statutes.
73-18-20.4.   Duty to report falsified vessel or motor number.

Any person owning or operating a marina, marine dealership, service station, public garage, paint shop, or a vessel repair shop shall immediately notify the local police authorities of any vessel or outboard motor that has any numbers that have apparently been altered, obliterated, or removed.



Enacted by Chapter 216, 1990 General Session

